New York, session 2025-2026, A692.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5-d of section 225 of the public health law, as 2 added by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the public health law 3 relating to requiring that functional epinephrine auto-injector devices 4 be made available in places of public assembly and that at least one 5 employee or volunteer of such place of public assembly be trained in its 6 proper operation and use and be present at each facility function, as 7 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 1078-A and A. 2885-A, is relet- 8 tered subdivision 5-e. 9 § 2. Paragraph (f) of subdivision 2 of section 3000-c of the public 10 health law, as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the 11 public health law relating to requiring that functional epinephrine 12 auto-injector devices be made available in places of public assembly and 13 that at least one employee or volunteer of such place of public assembly 14 be trained in its proper operation and use and be present at each facil- 15 ity function, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 1078-A and A. 16 2885-A, is amended to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02705-01-5 A. 692 2 1 (f) Nothing in this section shall require any eligible person or enti- 2 ty to acquire, possess, store, make available, or administer an epineph- 3 rine auto-injector, except as provided for in subdivision [five-d] 4 five-e of section two hundred twenty-five of this chapter. 5 § 3. Section three of a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the 6 public health law relating to requiring that functional epinephrine 7 auto-injector devices be made available in places of public assembly and 8 that at least one employee or volunteer of such place of public assembly 9 be trained in its proper operation and use and be present at each facil- 10 ity function, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 1078-A and A. 11 2885-A, is amended to read as follows: 12 § 3. This act shall take effect [immediately] nine months after it 13 shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 14 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 15 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 16 completed on or before such effective date. 17 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 18 sections one and two of this act shall take effect on the same date and 19 in the same manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the public 20 health law relating to requiring that functional epinephrine auto-injec- 21 tor devices be made available in places of public assembly and that at 22 least one employee or volunteer of such place of public assembly be 23 trained in its proper operation and use and be present at each facility 24 function, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 1078-A and A. 25 2885-A, takes effect.